Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1709
Notice; posting.

Every farm labor contractor covered by the Farm Labor Contractors Act shall post conspicuously upon the premises where employees working under the contractor are employed, in both English and Spanish, a notice specifying the contractor's compliance with the act and the name and Nebraska address of the surety on the bond or a notice that a deposit in lieu of the bond has been made with the department together with the address of the department.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 9.